Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-418
Changes in boundaries; creation of new school district; petition; requirements.

Petitions presented pursuant to section 79-415 shall be subject to the same requirements for content, hearings, notice, review, and appeal as petitions submitted pursuant to section 79-413, except that a petition presented pursuant to section 79-415 shall not become effective unless it is approved by a vote of a majority of the members of the State Committee for the Reorganization of School Districts. Any person adversely affected by the disapproval shall have the right of appeal under section 79-413.

Laws 1971, LB 468, § 5;

Laws 1984, LB 942, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-402.06;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 167;

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 8;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 32;

Laws 2005, LB 126, § 20;

Referendum 2006, No. 422;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 17.